North Dakota, session 69, HB1518.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 39-10-16 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
39-10-16. One-way roadways and rotary traffic islands.
1. The director and local authorities with respect to highways under their respective
jurisdictions may designate any highway, roadway, part of a roadway, or specific lanes
upon which vehicular traffic shall proceed in one direction at all or such times as shall
be indicated by official traffic-control devices.
2. Upon a roadway so designated for one-way traffic, a vehicle shall be driven only in the
direction designated at all or at such times as shall be indicated by official
traffic-control devices.
3. A vehicle passing around a rotary traffic island must be driven only to the right of such
island.
4. After a vehicle enters a rotary traffic island, the vehicle may not exit from any position
within the rotary traffic island without first giving a signal of intention to exit the rotary
traffic island.
Page No. 1 25.1126.01000